Utah statutes.
35A-3-506.   Diversion payment -- Referral to civic organizations.
When a client receives a diversion payment under Section 35A-3-303, the
division shall assess whether the client would benefit from services and
supports from a civic organization.  If so, the division may inform the client
of the services and supports that civic organizations provide.
